Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.621

Disposition of assets—When contributions required.

(1) In winding up a limited partnership's activities, the assets of the limited partnership, including the contributions required by this section, must be applied to satisfy the limited partnership's obligations to creditors including, to the extent permitted by law, partners that are creditors.

(2) Any surplus remaining after the limited partnership complies with subsection (1) of this section must be paid in cash as a distribution.

(3) If a limited partnership's assets are insufficient to satisfy all of its obligations under subsection (1) of this section, with respect to each unsatisfied obligation incurred when the limited partnership was not a limited liability limited partnership, the following rules apply:

(a) Each person that was a general partner when the obligation was incurred and that has not been released from the obligation under RCW 25.10.541 shall contribute to the limited partnership for the purpose of enabling the limited partnership to satisfy the obligation. The contribution due from each of those persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of general partner in effect for each of those persons when the obligation was incurred.

(b) If a person does not contribute the full amount required under (a) of this subsection with respect to an unsatisfied obligation of the limited partnership, the other persons required to contribute by (a) of this subsection on account of the obligation shall contribute the additional amount necessary to discharge the obligation. The additional contribution due from each of those other persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of general partner in effect for each of those other persons when the obligation was incurred.

(c) If a person does not make the additional contribution required by (b) of this subsection, further additional contributions are determined and due in the same manner as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(4) A person that makes an additional contribution under subsection (3)(b) or (c) of this section may recover from any person whose failure to contribute under subsection (3)(a) or (b) of this section necessitated the additional contribution. A person may not recover under this subsection more than the amount additionally contributed. A person's liability under this subsection may not exceed the amount the person failed to contribute.

(5) The estate of a deceased individual is liable for the person's obligations under this section.

(6) An assignee for the benefit of creditors of a limited partnership or a partner, or a person appointed by a court to represent creditors of a limited partnership or a partner, may enforce a person's obligation to contribute under subsection (3) of this section.

[ 2009 c 188 s 811.]